Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 18 Community Corrections

Intent and purpose of act. —

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 2, provides that the purpose and intent of this act is to encourage the development of community correctional facilities and programs and the diversion to these local community programs of adult low risk felons who would benefit by treatment in a community corrections program and to provide a program to aid in reintegrating inmates of correctional institutions into society, and further provides that it is the intent of the legislature that in the initial two years of operation, community correctional facilities and programs established pursuant to this act shall serve approximately equal numbers of clients from each of the following three categories: (1) offenders who would otherwise be incarcerated in state correctional institutions; (2) offenders who would otherwise be placed on probation; and (3) inmates serving a term of incarceration in a state correctional institution who meet the criteria of § 7-18-109(b).

Legislative intent in enacting chapter was to provide “halfway house”

between prison and probation. Peper v. State, 768 P.2d 26,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of private operator of “halfway house” or group home housing convicted prisoners before final release for injury to third person caused by inmate, 9 ALR5th 969.

§ 7-18-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Adult Community Corrections Act”.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-18-102(a)(ix).

§ 7-18-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Adult community correctional facility or program” means a community based or community-oriented facility or program which is operated either by a unit of local government or by a nongovernmental agency which:

May provide residential and nonresidential accommodations and services for offenders, parolees and inmates;

Provides programs and services to aid offenders, parolees and inmates in obtaining and holding regular employment, in enrolling in and maintaining academic courses, in participating in vocational training programs, in utilizing the resources of the community in meeting their personal and family needs and in participating in whatever specialized treatment programs exist within the community; and

Provides supervision for offenders, parolees and inmates as required.

“Corrections board” means a community corrections board created pursuant to this act;

“Inmate” means an adult serving a felony sentence in any state penal institution or any correctional facility operated pursuant to a contract under W.S.

7-22-102

, excluding any inmate who:

At the time of consideration has any criminal proceedings pending against him which could affect his status as an inmate;

Has been convicted of first degree murder;

Is serving a term of life imprisonment; or

Has been sentenced to death.

“Nongovernmental agency” means any person or organization other than a unit of local government and includes private profit and not for profit organizations;

“Offender” means an adult who has entered a plea of guilty or has been convicted of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment or a felony, excluding any person who:

At the time of consideration has any other felony criminal proceedings pending against him;

Has been convicted of, or pled guilty to, first degree murder;

Has been convicted of, or pled guilty to, a crime punishable by life imprisonment; or

Has been convicted of, or pled guilty to, a crime punishable by death.

“Unit of local government” means a county, city or town;

“Department” means the state department of corrections;

“Parolee” means an adult who has been granted parole under W.S.

7-13-402

;

“Validated risk-need assessment” means as defined in W.S. 7-13-1101(a)(iii);

“This act” means W.S.

7-18-101

through

7-18-115

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1986, ch. 65, § 1; 1990, ch. 11, § 1; 1991, ch. 84, § 1; ch. 252, § 2; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1995, ch. 101, § 2; 2003, ch. 42, § 1; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(ix) and redesignated former (a)(ix) as (a)(x).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability of act. —

Laws 1991, ch. 252, § 3, provides: “The powers and authority set forth in this act shall be in addition to such other powers and authority as may presently exist under the laws of the state of Wyoming relating to correctional facilities or jails, and the requirements set forth in this act (including in particular, requirements relating to the obtaining of necessary consents and approvals) shall be deemed to apply only to actions taken or to be taken under authority of this act and shall not apply to any such other powers or authority as may presently exist under the laws of the state of Wyoming.”

Cross references. —

As to state penitentiary, penitentiary farms, and Wyoming women's center, see chapter 2 of title 25.

Credit for time spent in Surveillance and Treatment Program. —

Where defendant was placed on probation and ordered to participate in Surveillance and Treatment of Offender Program (S.T.O.P.), defendant was not eligible for credit for the time spent in the program when her probation was revoked, since the defendant could not be charged with escape from S.T.O.P., and S.T.O.P. was not a community correctional center. Kupec v. State, 835 P.2d 359,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 7-18-103.
Establishment and operation of facilities and programs by local governments; screening procedures; acceptance or rejection of offenders, parolees or inmates.

Any unit of local government may establish, maintain and operate adult community correctional facilities and programs deemed necessary to serve its own needs and may enter into contracts or agreements with a corrections board for the placement of offenders, parolees and inmates in its adult community correctional facility or program.

The unit of local government shall establish procedures for screening offenders, parolees and inmates who are to be placed in its adult community correctional facility or program. The screening shall take into account the risk the offender, parolee or inmate may present to himself and others as well as the aptitude, attitude and social and occupational skills of the offender, parolee or inmate.

The unit of local government has the authority to accept, reject or reject after acceptance the placement of any offender, parolee or inmate in its adult community correctional facility or program pursuant to any contract or agreement with a corrections board. If an offender, parolee or inmate is rejected by the unit of local government after initial acceptance, the offender, parolee or inmate shall remain in the custody of the unit of local government for a reasonable period of time pending receipt of appropriate orders for transfer of the offender, parolee or inmate.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1995, ch. 101, § 2; 2003, ch. 42, § 1.

§ 7-18-104.
Establishment and operation of facilities or programs by nongovernmental agencies; required governmental approval; acceptance or rejection of offenders, parolees or inmates.

If approved as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a nongovernmental agency may establish, maintain and operate an adult community correctional facility and program and may contract with a corrections board to provide services to offenders, parolees and inmates.

The establishment of any nongovernmental adult community correctional facility or program shall be subject to approval of the board of county commissioners of the county and the governing body of the city or town in which the proposed facility or the situs of the program is to be located. Approval or denial of the establishment of the facility or program shall be made only after consultation with the corrections board and the department.

The nongovernmental agency operating an adult community correctional facility or program has the authority to accept, reject or reject after acceptance the placement of any offender, parolee or inmate in its facility or program pursuant to any contract or agreement with a corrections board. If an offender, parolee or inmate is rejected by the nongovernmental agency after initial acceptance, the offender, parolee or inmate shall remain in the custody of the nongovernmental agency for a reasonable period of time pending receipt of appropriate orders for transfer of the offender, parolee or inmate.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1995, ch. 101, § 2; 2003, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to requirements for operation of a private jail or prison, see §

7-22-101

et seq.

§ 7-18-105.
Establishment of county boards; membership; terms of office; compensation; meetings; officers.

A county may establish, or two (2) or more counties may agree to establish jointly, a community corrections board in accordance with this act.

A corrections board shall consist of nine (9) members appointed by the county commissioners. When two (2) or more counties have agreed to establish a corrections board, the county commissioners of each participating county shall appoint members as provided in the agreement of the counties. The corrections board shall be composed of:

One (1) district judge designated by the chief justice of the Wyoming supreme court;

One (1) prosecuting attorney;

One (1) municipal law enforcement officer;

One (1) county law enforcement officer;

One (1) probation and parole officer; and

Four (4) lay citizens, no more than two (2) of whom shall be from the same county if the corrections board is established by two (2) or more counties. If the community corrections board is established for a county in which a community college is located, one (1) of the four (4) lay citizen members shall be a representative of the community college.

Members of community corrections boards shall serve for rotating terms of four (4) years. Of the members first appointed, one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for three (3) years and one-third (1/3) for four (4) years.

Members of a corrections board shall serve without compensation.

A majority of the corrections board constitutes a quorum. All actions of the corrections board shall be approved by a majority of those present at the meeting.

A corrections board shall annually elect from its members a chairman to preside at meetings, a secretary to maintain the records and a finance officer who shall file with the board a bond with an approved corporate surety in the penal sum designated by the corrections board.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to county commissioners, see §

18-3-501

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 7-18-102(a)(ix).

§ 7-18-106.
Powers and duties of boards.

Subject to this act, a corrections board may:

Contract with the department to accept offenders, parolees and inmates for placement in an adult community correctional facility or program operating under a contract for services with the corrections board within the county or counties served by the corrections board;

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 42, § 2.

Accept, reject or reject after acceptance the placement pursuant to a contract with the department, of any offender, parolee or inmate in an adult community correctional facility or program. If an offender, parolee or inmate is rejected by the corrections board after initial acceptance, the offender, parolee or inmate shall be placed in the custody of a sheriff of a county served by the corrections board for a reasonable period of time pending receipt of appropriate orders for the transfer of the offender, parolee or inmate.

A corrections board shall:

Screen all offenders, parolees and inmates proposed to be placed in an adult community correctional facility or program taking into account the potential risk resulting from the placement of the offender, parolee or inmate as well as the aptitude, attitude and social and occupational skills of the offender, parolee or inmate;

Review, inspect and evaluate all adult community correctional facilities and programs operating within the county or counties served by the corrections board; and

If the offender is a convicted misdemeanant, obtain funding for the placement from nonstate sources.

Notwithstanding W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

or any other provision of law and except for intentional torts or illegal acts, a corrections board and its members are immune from any liability, either as a board or individually, for any actions or omissions by the board or any member thereof pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1991, ch. 84, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; ch. 83, § 1; 1995, ch. 101, § 2; 2003, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to county sheriff, see §

18-3-601

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a) and in this section, see § 7-18-102(a)(ix).

§ 7-18-107.
Required guidelines in contracts; review by local government.

Every contract for services entered into pursuant to this act between a corrections board and a local unit of government or a nongovernmental agency shall provide guidelines for the operation of the adult community correctional facility or program and minimum standards for the services provided, including:

Requirements for strict accountability procedures and practices for the conduct and supervision of offenders, parolees and inmates including requirements for twenty-four (24) hour supervision of offenders, parolees and inmates in residential programs;

Guidelines for service providers to perform periodic and unscheduled tests to determine the use of drugs by offenders, parolees and inmates; and

Guidelines for service providers to develop individual treatment plans for each offender, parolee or inmate.

Prior to entering into agreement or contract with any nongovernmental adult community corrections agency, the corrections board shall submit the agreement or contract and any proposed guidelines for the use of any program or facility to the department and the governing body of any affected unit of local government for its review and recommendations.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1995, ch. 101, § 2; 2003, ch. 42, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 7-18-102(a)(ix).

Detention. —

When defendant was confined to a community corrections facility, there was not doubt that she was officially detained in a corrections facility, and the escape statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-18-112(a)(i) still applied. When she signed out of the facility, ostensibly to go to work, she was guilty of escape because she was no longer employed. Jones v. State, 2006 WY 40, 132 P.3d 162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2006).

§ 7-18-108.
Placement of offender in program by court; placement by department as administrative sanction.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, following an eligible adult offender’s conviction or his plea of guilty, the sentencing court may, as a condition of probation, order that the offender participate in a residential or nonresidential adult community correctional program during all or any part of his term of probation.

Placement of an offender in an adult community correctional facility or program under this section shall be made only if:

The adult community correctional facility or program is operated by a governmental unit or a nongovernmental agency which has entered into a contract with the corrections board serving the county in which the defendant is sentenced and the corrections board has contracted with the department to provide adult community correctional services for offenders;

Funding for the placement is available;

The offender is acceptable to the corrections board; and

The offender is assessed through a validated risk-need assessment as a high risk for reoffending or violating a condition of probation.

Prior to the placement of an offender in any nongovernmental adult community correctional facility, the sentencing judge shall notify or cause to be notified the law enforcement agencies of affected units of local government concerning the identity of the offender to be placed.

The probation and parole agent for the judicial district shall include in the presentence report or otherwise recommend to the sentencing judge recommendations for the utilization of any governmental or, when available, nongovernmental adult community correctional facility or program which has been approved for use by the corrections board.

The probation and parole officers for the judicial district shall have general supervisory authority over all offenders placed in adult community correctional facilities or programs under this section.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the department may impose the administrative sanctions provided in W.S. 7-13-1802(b) on any probationer participating in an intensive supervision program who violates the rules and restrictions of the program as an alternative to probation revocation.

Notwithstanding paragraph (b)(iv) of this section, placement of a probationer in an adult community correctional program as a sanction under subsection (f) of this section and W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

or following a revocation of probation shall not require the probationer to be assessed through a validated risk-need assessment as a high risk for reoffending or violating a condition of probation.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1987, ch. 212, § 1; 1990, ch. 11, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1999, ch. 174, § 1; 2003, ch. 42, § 1; 2011, ch. 30, § 1; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 18, § 1, effective March 9, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to payment of expenses for return of an accused to the state, see §

7-3-224

.

As to presentence investigation and report, see Rule 32(a), W.R. Cr. P.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (d), substituted “agent” for “officers,” substituted “include” for “be responsible for including,” and inserted “when available.”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, added (b)(iv), substituted "W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

" for "W.S.

7-13-1107

." and made related changes in (f).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, inserted “or otherwise recommend” preceding “to the sentencing judge” in (d).

The 2020 amendment,

in (f), substituted “impose the administrative sanctions provided in W.S. 7-13-1802(b) on” for “, as an administrative sanction pursuant to W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

, require” and deleted “to participate in a residential adult community correctional program for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days” following “restrictions of the program”; and added (g).

Laws 2020, ch. 18, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2020.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Penitentiary credit for time served in facility. —

Upon being sentenced to the penitentiary for violation of probation, one who has served time as a resident in a community correctional facility is entitled to credit for that time served. Prejean v. State, 794 P.2d 877,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1990).

Appellant inmate was improperly denied credit for the time spent at a community corrections facility (CCF) after a violation of probation because time in a CCF constituted official detention under this section and a person in a CCF could be charged with escape under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-18-112

.
Baker v. State, 2011 WY 53, 248 P.3d 640,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2011).

Quoted

in

Endris v. State, 2010 WY 73, 233 P.3d 578,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(June 3, 2010).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's submission to polygraph or other lie detector testing, 86 ALR4th 709.

§ 7-18-109.
Transfer of inmate to facility by department.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, and upon recommendation of the warden or superintendent of the institution, the department may transfer an adult inmate to a residential adult community correctional facility.

A transfer of an inmate to a residential adult community correctional facility under this section may be made only if:

The department determines the inmate poses a low risk of escape or violence;

The inmate is eligible under W.S. 7-18-102(a)(iii);

The inmate is within at least twenty-four (24) months of his parole eligibility date and his conduct during his confinement has been such that he is appropriate for placement;

The residential adult community correctional facility is operated under a contract with a corrections board and the corrections board has contracted with the department to provide services which include placement of pre-parole inmates;

The inmate has been accepted by the corrections board;

Funding for the placement is available; and

The department determines the correctional needs of the inmate will be better served by the transfer.

Prior to the placement of an inmate in any nongovernmental adult community correctional facility, the department shall notify or cause to be notified the law enforcement agencies of affected units of local government concerning the identity of the inmate to be placed.

No inmate shall be transferred to a residential adult community corrections facility under this section unless he agrees in writing to abide by the regulations of the program provider and any additional conditions imposed by the department. Approval of a transfer under this section is not a discharge of the inmate but shall be construed as an extension of the limits of confinement of the institution to which the inmate was committed. The department may revoke the approval of the transfer of an inmate under this section at any time for violation by the inmate of any conditions of the placement. Upon revocation the inmate shall be returned to the physical custody of the department.

The probation and parole officers for the judicial district shall have general supervisory authority over all inmates in adult community correctional facilities or programs under this section.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1986, ch. 65, § 1; 1990, ch. 11, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; ch. 83, § 1; 1999, ch. 174, § 1; 2003, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to “inmate” of institution, see § 7-18-102(a)(iii).

Penitentiary credit for time served in facility. —

Upon being sentenced to the penitentiary for violation of probation, one who has served time as a resident in a community correctional facility is entitled to credit for that time served. Prejean v. State, 794 P.2d 877,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Wood v. Wood, 964 P.2d 1259,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1998); Turner v. State, 2015 WY 29,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Feb. 25, 2015).

§ 7-18-110.
Authority of department of corrections to contract for services.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the department may, by negotiation without competitive bids or by competitive bidding, contract with any community corrections board created under this act, to provide services for:

Convicted felony offenders ordered by a sentencing court to participate in adult community correctional facilities or programs as a condition of probation;

Inmates transferred to a residential adult community correctional facility by the department pursuant to W.S.

7-18-109

; or

Parolees required to participate in a residential or nonresidential adult community correctional program as a condition of parole pursuant to W.S.

7-18-115

.

No inmate, parolee or offender shall be deemed to be a third party beneficiary of, or to be otherwise entitled to enforce any provision of, any contract entered into under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1991, ch. 84, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; ch. 83, § 1; 1995, ch. 101, § 2; 2003, ch. 42, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 7-18-102(a)(ix).

§ 7-18-111.
Duties of department of corrections.

The department shall:

Establish minimum facility standards for residential adult community correctional facilities operated by any entity receiving funds under this act;

Establish minimum standards for adult community correctional programs;

Review and evaluate all adult community correctional facilities and programs funded under this act;

Prescribe accounting and reporting standards for all program providers under this act;

Establish a per diem rate to be paid program providers under this act which shall not exceed the daily cost of keeping an inmate at the Wyoming state penitentiary;

Promulgate rules and regulations reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2003, ch. 42, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-18-102(a)(ix).

§ 7-18-112.
Escape.

An offender, parolee or an inmate is deemed guilty of escape from official detention and shall be punished as provided by W.S. 6-5-206(a)(i) if, without proper authorization, he:

Fails to remain within the extended limits of his confinement or to return within the time prescribed to an adult community correctional facility to which he was assigned or transferred; or

Being a participant in a program established under the provisions of this act he leaves his place of employment or fails or neglects to return to the adult community correctional facility within the time prescribed or when specifically ordered to do so.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1995, ch. 101, § 2; 2003, ch. 42, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(ii), see § 7-18-102(a)(ix).

Specific intent. —

Supreme Court of Wyoming cannot find any indication in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-5-206(a)(i) or

7-18-112

that the legislature intended there to be a specific intent element to the crime of escape, and, as the supreme court has previously said, escape is a general intent crime.
Seymore v. State, 2007 WY 32, 152 P.3d 401,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2007), limited, Wyant v. State, 2020 WY 15, 458 P.3d 13,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2020).

Participation in community correctional program does not constitute “supervision on probation or parole”

that would preclude prosecution for the offense of escape from official detention. Peper v. State, 768 P.2d 26,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1989).

Wyoming grants credit for the time spent

in those environments from which a charge of escape would lie. Kupec v. State, 835 P.2d 359,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1992).

Credit for time spent in community corrections facility. —

Appellant inmate was improperly denied credit for the time spent at a community corrections facility (CCF) after a violation of probation because time in a CCF constituted official detention under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-18-108(a) and a person in a CCF could be charged with escape under this section.
Baker v. State, 2011 WY 53, 248 P.3d 640,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2011).

Credit for time spent in Surveillance and Treatment Program.—

Where defendant was placed on probation and ordered to participate in Surveillance and Treatment of Offender Program (S.T.O.P.), defendant was not eligible for credit for the time spent in the program when her probation was revoked, since the defendant could not be charged with escape from S.T.O.P., and S.T.O.P. was not a community correctional center. Kupec v. State, 835 P.2d 359,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1992).

Jury not instructed prohibited conduct had to be undertakenvoluntarily. —

Conviction for escape was reversed where cumulative effect of an instructional error and the prosecutor's misstatements Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-206(a)(i) created verdict that could not be trusted, because the jury had not been instructed that it had to find that appellant had acted voluntarily; even a general intent crime required a showing that the prohibited conduct was undertaken voluntarily.
Seymore v. State, 2007 WY 32, 152 P.3d 401,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2007), limited, Wyant v. State, 2020 WY 15, 458 P.3d 13,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2020).

Sufficiency of Evidence. —

When a defendant signed out of a community corrections facility, ostensibly to go to work when she no longer had a job, evidence was sufficient to show defendant was guilty of escape. Moreover, defendant failed to show that this section was unconstitutional; she failed to raise the constitutional issue before the district court, and she failed to show plain error. Jones v. State, 2006 WY 40, 132 P.3d 162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2006).

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction for escape. Although there was no direct evidence of where defendant was during the hours he was missing from a work site, the circumstantial evidence was sufficient to allow the jury to conclude beyond a reasonable doubt that defendant left his place of employment.
Martin v. State, 2007 WY 2, 149 P.3d 707,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2007).

Applied

in

Smith v. State, 932 P.2d 1281,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Angerhofer v. State, 758 P.2d 1041,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1988); Prejean v. State, 794 P.2d 877,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1990); Jenkins v. State, 2002 WY 107, 49 P.3d 1028,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2002); Hagen v. State, 2014 WY 141,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Nov. 5, 2014).

Cited

in

Young v. State, 904 P.2d 359,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1995); Shaughnessy v. United States, 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 5300, 93 F. Supp. 2d 1195 (D. Wyo. 2000); Endris v. State, 2010 WY 73, 233 P.3d 578,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(June 3, 2010); Yearout v. State, 2013 WY 133, 311 P.3d 180,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 139

, 2013 WL 5728045 (Oct 22, 2013); Yearout v. State, 2013 WY 133, 311 P.3d 180,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 139

, 2013 WL 5728045 (Oct 22, 2013).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “custody” under 18 USCS § 751(a) defining offense of escape from custody, 114 ALR Fed 581.

§ 7-18-113.
Confinement of violators.

If the administrator of an adult community correctional facility or any other appropriate supervising authority has cause to believe that an offender, parolee or inmate placed in an adult community correctional facility has violated any rule or condition of that person’s placement in that facility or any term of post-release supervision or cannot be safely housed in that facility, the administrator or other authority shall certify to the department the facts which are the basis for the belief and execute a transfer order to the sheriff of the county in which the facility is located, who shall confine the offender, parolee or inmate in the county jail pending a determination by the appropriate judicial or executive authorities as to whether or not the offender, parolee or inmate shall remain in community corrections.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1995, ch. 101, § 2; 2003, ch. 42, § 1.

§ 7-18-114.
Record and disbursement of wages; exemption from process; confidentiality of amount.

Wages earned by an inmate, parolee or offender while in an adult community corrections program shall be retained and accounted for by the program operator and shall be disbursed for the purposes provided in this subsection and in the order specified:

Personal necessities;

Room and board to the program operator at a rate to be established by the department;

Support of dependent relations;

Court ordered restitution, fines, sanctions and reimbursement for the services of public defender or court appointed counsel, the surcharge imposed under W.S.

1-40-119

, victims compensation obligations under W.S. 1-40-112(g) and the surcharge imposed under W.S.

7-13-1616

;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 62, § 2.

Costs of health insurance; and

Remaining funds shall be paid to the inmate, parolee or offender upon parole or final discharge.

Wages earned by offenders, other than parolees or inmates, while in a residential adult community corrections program shall be retained and accounted for by the program operator and shall be disbursed only for the purposes and in the order specified in subsection (a) of this section unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court. Any remaining funds shall be paid to the offender upon his satisfactory discharge from the program. Upon revocation of an offender’s probation, the program operator shall forward any remaining funds to the court or to the institution to which the offender is sentenced as directed by the court.

Program operators shall keep an accurate record and account of all wages earned by inmates, parolees and offenders pursuant to the rules promulgated by the department.

The earnings of inmates under this act are not subject to garnishment, attachment or execution.

Information relating to the amount of wages earned by an inmate, parolee or offender in an adult community corrections program is confidential and is not subject to public inspection.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1988, ch. 39, § 1; 1990, ch. 94, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1995, ch. 101, § 2; 1999, ch. 62, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 42, § 1; 2016 ch. 71, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to victim restitution, see chapter 9 of this title.

As to attachment, replevin and garnishment, see chapter 15 of title 1.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “and” following “W.S.

1-40-119

” and inserted “and the surcharge imposed under W.S.

7-13-1616

” in (a)(iv).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (d), see § 7-18-102(a)(ix).

§ 7-18-115.
Assignment of parolee to program by state board of parole; placement by department as administrative sanction.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the state board of parole may, as a condition of parole, require a parolee to participate in a residential or nonresidential adult community correctional program during all or any part of his term of parole.

Placement of a parolee in an adult community correctional facility or program under this section shall be made only if:

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 116, § 3.

The adult community correctional facility or program is operated under a contract with a corrections board and the corrections board has contracted with the department to provide services which include placement of parolees;

The parolee has been accepted by the corrections board;

Funding for the placement is available; and

The offender is assessed through a validated risk-need assessment as a high risk of reoffending or violating a condition of parole.

Prior to the placement of a parolee in any nongovernmental adult community correctional facility, the department shall notify or cause to be notified the law enforcement agencies of affected units of local government concerning the identity of the parolee to be placed.

No parolee shall be paroled to an adult residential community corrections facility under this section unless he agrees in writing to abide by the regulations of the program provider and any additional conditions imposed by the state board of parole and the department.

The state board of parole may revoke a parolee’s parole at any time for violation by the parolee of any conditions of the placement under this section. Upon revocation, the parolee shall be returned to the physical custody of the department.

The probation and parole officers for the judicial district shall have general supervisory authority over all parolees placed in adult community correctional facilities or programs under this section.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the department may impose the administrative sanctions provided in W.S. 7-13-1802(b) on any parolee participating in an intensive supervision program who violates the rules and restrictions of the program as an alternative to parole revocation.

Notwithstanding paragraph (b)(v) of this section, placement of a parolee in an adult community correctional program authorized under this article as a sanction under subsection (g) of this section, W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

or following a modification or revocation of parole shall not require the parolee to be assessed through a validated risk-need assessment as a high risk for reoffending or violating a condition of probation.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 101, § 1; 1999, ch. 174, § 1; 2003, ch. 42, § 1; 2019 ch. 116, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 18, § 1, effective March 9, 2020.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 116 § 2, effective July 1, 2019, added (b)(v) in (g), substituted "W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

" for "W.S.

7-13-1107

" and made related changes.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 116 § 3, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (b)(i), which read: "The state board of parole determines the inmate poses a low risk of escape or violence."

The 2020 amendment,

in (g), substituted “impose the administrative sanctions provided in W.S. 7-13-1802(b) on” for “, as an administrative sanction pursuant to W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

, require” and deleted “to participate in an adult residential community correctional program for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days” following “restrictions of the program”; and added (h).

Laws 2020, ch. 18, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2020.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."